src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! # The Livvi Karelian morphophonological/twolc rules file 

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! ## Alphatbet, sets
Alphabet
a b c č d e f g h i j k l m n o p r s š ş t u v w y z ž ƶ ü ä ö !!≈ **@CODE@**
A B C Č D E F G H I J K L M N O P R S Š Ş T U V W Y Z Ž Ƶ Ü Ä Ö !!≈ **@CODE@**
y !!≈ **@CODE@**
Y !!≈ **@CODE@**
ʼ ! MODIFIER LETTER APOSTROPHE 02BC

! Vowel harmony with "(t)a/ä"
!
!%{aäPar%}:0	!!= @CODE@  This is for the partitive and other vowel harmony not including diphthong phenomena
%{aä%}:a !!≈ **@CODE@**
%{aä%}:ä !!≈ **@CODE@**
%{ä%}:ä !!≈ * **@CODE@** is for ä that doesn't diphthongise, e.g. PropN -pää

! Note these two aoeInf and äöeInf are not is use, which I think is just as fine, as I see no rationale for it. TT.
 %{aoeInf%}:a	!!= @CODE@ Back vowel infinitive marker
 %{äöeInf%}:ä	!!= @CODE@ Front vowel infinitive marker

! %{aäDiph%}:ä !!= @CODE@  This is for the infinitive marker after i and u stems

 %{aäoeöuiy%}:ä !!= * @CODE@  with partitive type koivuu
 %{aäoeö%}:ä !!= * @CODE@  newer This is for diphthongs such as the infinitive marker after i and u stems ampuo
%{aäuyiØ%}:ä !!= * @CODE@ in participle endings anticipating PÄIVY or KOIRU type

 %{ui%}:i !!= @CODE@  in imperative before %{aä%}:

! Vowel harmony with "loi/löi" also kalatOÖ1in
%{oö%}:o !!≈ **@CODE@**
%{oö%}:ö !!≈ **@CODE@**

%{oöØ%}:0 !!= @CODE@  Used in present participle

! Vowel harmony with "ttu/tty"
!%{uy%}:u
%{uy%}:y !!≈ **@CODE@**

 %{ijPRC%}:j !!= @CODE@ participle
 %{lnrs%}:n  !!= * @CODE@ e.g. in perfect participles
 %{dtlnr%}:d !!= * @CODE@ e.g. infinitive and Ind+Prs+Pl3



! in verb type V_AVATA
!A2:a
!A2:ä !Trond: Not in use.
!A2:o
!A2:ö

!! this appears in the illative
V1:a  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V1:e  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V1:i  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V1:o  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V1:u  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V1:y  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V1:ä  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V1:ö  !!≈ **@CODE@**

!! These appear with the inessive and adessive
V2:a  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V2:e  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V2:i  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V2:o  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V2:u  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V2:y  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V2:ä  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V2:ö  !!≈ **@CODE@**

!! These reduplicate the preceding vowel if it in turn is preceded by a consonant
V3:a  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V3:e  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V3:i  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V3:o  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V3:u  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V3:y  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V3:ä  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V3:ö  !!≈ **@CODE@**
V3:0  !!≈ **@CODE@**

%^DEVOICE:0   !!= @CODE@ 
%^VOICE:0   !!= @CODE@  pestä : pezen

! syllable boundary for V_AVATA
%^SyllBound:0 !!≈ **@CODE@**


! Used with ks:s, ps:s
%^KS2S:0 !!≈ **@CODE@**

!! no change
!! The example here is for something that should not be done
!! We have two infinite sets, Livvi Karelian and incoming loanwords.
!! The original idea was to make a rule changing all instances of 
!! adjacent double aa to ua. For this reason a special trigger was
!! to be inserted into the lexc stem of a word to prevent such a rule
!! from occurring. Since the infinite Livvi Karelian set is more predictable
!! and perhaps smaller than the incoming loanword set, it is better
!! to literally spell out adjacent vowels that are constant. 2019-09-02 JMR
%^NONE:0 !!≈ @CODE@ This will break vowel change, e.g. sa%^NONEamelaine

! this k is not effected by gradation
K1:k
%^NoGrad:0 ! This will be placed after a stem to break Gradation

! This is used in combination with WGStem to trigger change in penultimate coda
! The penultimate coda trigger is used profusely in sms and vro
! it allows for distinguishing between ultimate and penultimate coda,
! but due to this distinction it is also a good idea to configure with
! ./configure --enable-reversed-intersect
! , which means that the triggers are seen before the stems and requires
! LESS memory. 2019-09-02 JMR
%^Pen:0 !! = @CODE@ pagisou paistah in combination with WGStem to trigger

! this weakens the stem _ompel_ to _ommel_
%^WGStem:0


%^D2Z:0	 !!= @CODE@ ! The ti => zi

! the a => o
%^A2O:0


%^E2O:0	!!= @CODE@  the e => o, e => ö

! the a => u, ä => y
%^A2U:0
%^A2UÄ2Y:0

%^Ä2I:0		!!= @CODE@  ä => i
%^A2UÄ2I:0		!!= @CODE@  a => u, ä => i

%^ILoss:0  !!= @CODE@  the i => 0 **reboi reboloi**
%^V2U:0	   !!= @CODE@  v => y **kävvä käydy**

! Vowel raising
%^RVow:0   !!= _@CODE@_ 
%^RmVow:0   !!= _@CODE@_ vowel removal, e.g. with superlative

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <


%- !Hyphen in  constructions 
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
%>  ! Inflectional suffix
#   ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds


%^LVow:0
%^LCns:0
%^WCns:0
%^AtoO:0
%^ÄtoÖ:0
%^OddSyll:0
%^StretchSyll2:0
%^SyllBr:0
%^E1:0

!! Triggers dictating right context phenomena
%{back%}:0 !!= * _@CODE@_ back harmony until harmony boundary, i.e. word boundary
%{front%}:0 !!= * _@CODE@_ front harmony until harmony boundary, i.e. word boundary



;

!! ### Sets
Sets

VowBack = a o u A O U ;
VowFront = ä ö y ü Ä Ö Y Ü ;
VowNeutral = e i E I ; 
VowNonHigh = a o ä ö e A O Ä Ö E ;
VowNotHiLab = a o ä ö e i 
              A O Ä Ö E I ;

Vow = a o u ä ö y ü e i 
      A O U Ä Ö Y Ü E I ;

Cns = b c č d f g h j k l m n p r s ş š t v z ƶ ž 
      B C Č D F G H J K L M N P R S Ş Š T V Z Ƶ Ž ;

Letters = Vow Cns ;

HarmDummy = %{back%} %{front%} ;

Dummy = %^ILoss %^KS2S %^WGStem %^E1 %^SyllBound  %^VOICE %> %^NONE HarmDummy ;


Definitions

! Front Trigger
FT =  [ #: Cns* [ VowFront | VowNeutral | i: ] | :VowFront ] [ %> | VowFront: | ʼ | Cns: | %{aä%}:ä | %{oö%}:ö | %{uy%}:y ]* \[ # | VowBack: | :VowBack ]* ;
! [ #: Cns* [ VowFront | VowNeutral | i: ] | :VowFront ] [ %> | VowFront: | Cns: | %{aä%}:ä | %{oö%}:ö | %{uy%}:y ]*  ;

FHarm = [ # \[ # | %{back%}: ]*  %{front%}: \[ # | %{back%}: ]* ] ;
!FHarm = [ %{front%}: \[ # | %{back%}: ]* ] ;

! Back Trigger 
BT =     #: Cns* ( [ VowNeutral | i: ] [ Dummy: | %> | VowNeutral | VowBack: | :VowBack | Cns: | :Cns | ʼ ]* )  [ VowBack: | :VowBack ] \[ # | VowFront: | :VowFront ]* ;
!    #: Cns* ( [ VowNeutral | i: ] [ Dummy: | %> | VowBack: | :VowBack | Cns: | :Cns ]* )  [ VowBack: | :VowBack ] [ Dummy: | %> | VowNeutral | i: | %{aä%}:0 | VowBack: | :VowBack | Cns: | :Cns ]* ;

BHarm = [ # \[ # | %{front%}: ]*  %{back%}: \[ # | %{front%}: ]* ] ;
!BHarm = [ %{back%}: \[ # | %{front%}: ]* ] ;

!Front Trigger with consonant
FTCons = [FT|FHarm] [ Cns: (ʼ:) ] ;

!Back Trigger with consonant
BTCons = [BT | BHarm ] [ Cns: (ʼ:) ] ;

! Cns or Cns with palatal
ConsPalOrNot = [Cns: (ʼ:)]+ ;

! Gradation strong to weak
!GS2W = [ p:v | m p:m | t:0 | l t:l | r t:r | n t:n | s t:s | k:0 | l k:0 | r k:0 | n k:g | s k:0 ] ;

! Short vowel
SV = [ [ #: | Cns+ ] :Vow ] ;

 ! If a vowel is preceeded by this, is can be long
!  in both the inessive and the adessive
! Inessive lengthening of vowel
IL = [ #: Cns* Vow : Cns:+ | Cns* Vow+ Cns:+  Vow:+ Cns:+  ] ;

!! Right context for gradation
GRC =  [ [ ( %> ) %{aä%}: | [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | %{uy%}: | Vow: | :Vow ] ( %>  i )  |  %>  i ] %^WGStem:0  ;

! oma:ommaa, 
! Subsequent Long Vowel
! preceeded by "Cns _"
! 2012-10-11 SLV =  [ :Vow [ ( %> %^LCns:0 %^LVow:0 | %> %^LCns:0 | %> i %> | %> ) [ V1:Vow | %{aä%}: ] |  0:Vow %> ( %^LCns:0 | %^WGStem: ) %^LVow: | %> %^LCns:0  ] ] ;

!! # Rules
Rules

!"%{aäPar%}:o"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:o <=>   [%{back%}: o: |o: %{back%}:] %> _ [# | %> ] ;
! ! o: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m %{oö%}: | t t %{oö%}: ]];


!"%{aäPar%}:ö"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:ö <=>  [%{front%}: ö: |ö: %{front%}:]  %> _ [# | %> ] ;
! ! ö: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m %{oö%}: | t t %{oö%}: ]];


!"%{aäDiph%}:o"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäDiph%}:o <=> o: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
!         [ o: | u] %> _ [ # | %> ] ;

!"%{aäDiph%}:ö"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäDiph%}:ö <=> ö: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
!         [ ö: | y] %> _ [ # | %> ] ;

!"%{aäDiph%}:e"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäDiph%}:e <=> [ e: | i ] %> _ [ # | %> ]  ;

!"%{aäDiph%}:ä"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäDiph%}:ä <=> [ FTCons %> | [FT|FHarm] %> [ d: | v v | j | h | t ]] _ [ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ h | # | %> ] | i | %> n %{uy%}: | %> g i | # ] ;
!   [ FTCons %> | [FT|FHarm] ( %^WGStem:0 ) %> [ t (t) | s s ]] _ [  h | %> g | # ] ;
!               Cns:  ä: %{front%}:  (%^Ä2I:) %> _ \[ .#. | %{back%}: ]* [  %> | # ] ;
!   [ FTCons %> | [ [FT|FHarm] ] ( %^WGStem:0 (%^E1:) ) %> [ (k) k (%{ui%}:i) |g (%{ui%}:)| m | d: | (t) t | s s ]] _ [  h | z |  s | ( n ) n | t t | m m | v |l | %> %{ijPRC%}: | %> g | # ] ;
! !€# lʼykkä%^WGStem%>kk%{ui%}%{aä%}mm%{oö%}
! !€0 lʼyk0ä0%>kkiämmö
! !€# lʼykkä%>%{aä%}%>m%{aä%}h
! !€0 lʼykki%>ä%>mäh
! !€# lʼykkä%>%{aä%}%>%{ijPRC%}%{aä%}%^A2U
! !€0 lʼykki0ä%>jy0

"%{aä%}:a"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 %{aä%}:a <=> BHarm (%>) _ ;
!%{aä%}:a <=> [BT|BHarm] (%>) _ ;
!! kuvitella+V+Inf: **imagine/kuvitella**
!!€ kuvittel%{back%}%^WGStem%>%{lnrs%}%{aä%}%^WGStem
!!€ kuvi0tel00%>la0

"%{aä%}:ä"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 %{aä%}:ä <=> FHarm (%>) _ ;
!%{aä%}:ä <=> [FT|FHarm] (%>) _ ;
!! ezitellä+V+Inf: **present/esitellä**
!!€ ezittel%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{lnrs%}%{aä%}%^WGStem
!!€ ezi0tel00%>lä0


! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
!"%{aäDiph%}:a"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäDiph%}:a <=> [ BTCons %> | [BT|BHarm] %> [ d: | v v | h | j | t ]] _ [ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ h | # | %> ] | i | %> n %{uy%}: | %> g i | # ] ;
!   [ BTCons %> | [BT|BHarm] ( %^WGStem:0 )  %> [ t (t) | s s ]] _ [  h | %> g | # ] ;
!               Cns:  a: %{back%}: (%^A2U:) %> _ \[ .#. | %{front%}: ]* [  %> | # ] ;
!   [ BTCons %> | [ [BT|BHarm] ] ( %^WGStem:0 (%^E1:) ) %> [ (k) k (%{ui%}:u) |g (%{ui%}:) | m | d: | (t) t | s s ]] _ [  h | z | s | ( n ) n | t t | m m | v | l | %> %{ijPRC%}: | %> g | # ] ;
! !€# kanda%>kk%{ui%}%{aä%}mm%{oö%}
! !€0 kanda%>kkuammo
! !€# pagis%>d%{aä%}%^WGStemh
! !€0 pa0is%>ta0h

!"%{aäDiph%}:o"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäDiph%}:o <=> [ o: | u ] %{back%}: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
!         [ o: ] %{back%}: %> _ [# | %> ] ;

!"%{aäDiph%}:ö"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäDiph%}:ö <=> [ ö: | y ] %{front%}: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
!         Cns: [ ö: ] %{front%}: %> _ [# | %> ] ;

! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
!"%{aäPar%}:a"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäPar%}:a <=>
!  [BHarm BTCons ( %> ) | [BHarm] %>  %{ijPRC%}:j %> | BHarm [ %{ui%}:u | %{uy%}:u | %{aäPar%}:u | a:u ] ( %> ) ] _ [ # | ( ( %^WGStem:0 ) %> )  [ Cns: | %{uy%}:u ] | %^WGStem:0 ] ;
!   [BT|BHarm] %>  %{ijPRC%}:j %> %{ui%}:u _ ;
!  [BT|BHarm] %> d: _  ;
! !€# pagis%>d%{aä%}%^WGStemh
! !€0 pa0is%>ta0h

!"%{aäPar%}:u"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:u <=>
! [ u: |[ [BT|BHarm] |BHarm :VowBack Cns:* ] ( %> ) %{uy%}:u ] %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ g i | n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
! !€# luadi%{back%}%^WGStem%^E1%>tt%{uy%}%>%{uy%}
! !€0 luaji000%>ttu%>u

!       BHarm  [ u ] %> _  ;
! 	 [BT|BHarm] [ Cns: | %{ijPRC%}: ] _ [ %^A2U:0 [ # | %> g i ] | %> %{aäPar%}:a ] ;

! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Front
!"%{aäPar%}:ä"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäPar%}:ä <=>
!  [FHarm FTCons ( %> ) | [FT|FHarm] %>  %{ijPRC%}:j %> | FHarm [ %{ui%}:i | %{uy%}:y | %{aäPar%}:i | ä:i ] ( %> ) ] _ [ # | ( ( %^WGStem:0 ) %> )  [ Cns: | %{uy%}:y ] | %^WGStem:0 ] ;


!"%{aäPar%}:e"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäPar%}:e <=>  e:  %> _ [ # | (%^WGStem:) %> ] ;
! !€ hävi%>%{aäPar%}%>%{uy%}
! !€ hävi0e%>y
! !€ hävi%>%{aäPar%}%>n
! !€ hävi%>e0n

!"%{aäPar%}:i"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:i <=> [FT|FHarm] Cns: _ %> %{aäPar%}:ä ;
!   FHarm  Cns: i %> _ ;

!"%{aäPar%}:y"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:y <=> [FT|FHarm] [ Cns: | %{ijPRC%}: ] _ %^A2U:0 [ # | %> g i ] ;
!    FHarm  y %> _ ;
